Hawaii statutes.
§161-48 Construction. The licenses
required by this chapter shall be in addition to any other licenses required by
law.

The requirements of this chapter shall apply to
persons, establishments, poultry, and poultry products regulated under the
Poultry Products Inspection Act only to the extent provided for in section 23
of the Act.

The operation and effect of and provision of
this chapter conferring a general power shall not be impaired or qualified by
the granting of a specific power or powers. Each provision of this chapter is
intended to be construed liberally in light of the declaration stated in
section 161-2.

If any of the provisions of this chapter are in
conflict with any statute, rule, or ordinance, this chapter shall take
precedence. [L 1969, c 212, §31; am L 1993, c 92, §13]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next